Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Supplement, 202515-203
Occupation tax; power to levy; exemptions.

A city of the primary class shall have power to raise revenue by levying and collecting a license or occupation tax on any person, partnership, limited liability company, corporation, or business within the limits of the city and regulate the same by ordinance except as otherwise provided in this section and in section 15-212. After March 27, 2014, any occupation tax imposed pursuant to this section shall make a reasonable classification of businesses, users of space, or kinds of transactions for purposes of imposing such tax, except that no occupation tax shall be imposed on any transaction which is subject to tax under section 53-160, 66-489, 66-489.02, 66-4,140, 66-4,145, 66-4,146, 77-2602, or 77-4008 or which is exempt from tax under section 77-2704.24. All such taxes shall be uniform in respect to the class upon which they are imposed. All scientific and literary lectures and entertainments shall be exempt from such taxation as well as concerts and all other musical entertainments given exclusively by the citizens of the city.

Laws 1901, c. 16, § 129, XIV, p. 130;

Laws 1905, c. 16, § 11, p. 212;

R.S.1913, § 4425;

C.S.1922, § 3809;

C.S.1929, § 15-212;

R.S.1943, § 15-203;

Laws 1993, LB 121, § 131;

Laws 2012, LB745, § 4;

Laws 2014, LB474, § 3;

Laws 2025, LB647, § 19.

Assessment of occupation tax based on gross earnings and also a franchise tax is not double taxation. Lincoln Traction Co. v. City of Lincoln, 84 Neb. 327, 121 N.W. 435 (1909); Nebraska Tel. Co. v. City of Lincoln, 82 Neb. 59, 117 N.W. 284 (1908).

Payment of an occupation tax cannot be made a condition precedent to obtaining a license to conduct business sought to be taxed. State ex rel. School Dist. of City of Lincoln v. Aitken, 61 Neb. 490, 85 N.W. 395 (1901).